Washington statutes.
RCW 15.53.9042

Department to publish distribution information, production data, and analyses comparison.

The department shall publish at least annually, in such forms as it may deem proper, information concerning the distribution of commercial feed, together with such data on their production and use as it may consider advisable, and a report of the results of the analyses of official samples of commercial feed within the state as compared with the analyses guaranteed on the label or as calculated from the invoice data for customer-formula feeds: PROVIDED, That the information concerning production and use of commercial feeds shall not disclose the operations of any person.

[ 1995 c 374 s 43; 1965 ex.s. c 31 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.